apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="vil/le__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>illet</l>                 <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>illet</l>                 <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>illet</l>                 <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>illet</l>                 <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>illende</l>               <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>                      <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>                    <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>                   <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>                   <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>                      <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>                      <r>le<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/urde__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>                 <r>urde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>                 <r>urde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>                 <r>urde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>                 <r>urde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdende</l>               <r>urde<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>                  <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>                  <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdes</l>                 <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urdet</l>                 <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>                    <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørs</l>                   <r>urde<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="må/tte__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>åttet</l>                 <r>tte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åttet</l>                 <r>tte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åttet</l>                 <r>tte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åttet</l>                 <r>tte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åttende</l>               <r>tte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>                   <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>                   <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ttet</l>                  <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>                      <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>                      <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ttes</l>                  <r>tte<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Punctuation -->




    <!-- Abbreviations -->

<pardef n="t.eks.__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



  </pardefs>

<e lm="burde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/urde__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="måtte">           <i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="ville">           <i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="DKK" a="PT">      <i>DKK</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="MF" c="medlem af Folketinget"><i>MF</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="SEK" a="PT">      <i>SEK</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="a/s" c="aktieselskab"><i>a/s</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="adr." a="PT">     <i>adr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="anm." a="PT">     <i>anm.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ar" a="PT">       <i>ar</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="aug." a="PT">     <i>aug.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bet." a="PT">     <i>bet.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bibl." a="PT">    <i>bibl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bl.a.">           <i>bl.a.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ca." a="PT">      <i>ca.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="cam" a="PT">      <i>cam</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="cd-r" a="PT">     <i>cd-r</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="cm" a="PT">       <i>cm</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="d.s.s." c="det samme som"><i>d.s.s.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="d.y." a="PT">     <i>d.y.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dec." a="PT">     <i>dec.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dia" a="PT">      <i>dia</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="diam." a="PT">    <i>diam.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dj" a="PT">       <i>dj</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dm" a="PT">       <i>dm</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="do." a="PT">      <i>do.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dr." a="PT">      <i>dr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dvd" a="PT">      <i>dvd</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="e.g." a="PT">     <i>e.g.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="efter ordre" a="PT"><i>efter<b/>ordre</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="egentlig" a="PT"><i>egentlig</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="egtl." a="PT">    <i>egtl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="el." a="PT">      <i>el.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="etc." a="PT">     <i>etc.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="f." a="PT">       <i>f.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="f.o.m." a="PT">   <i>f.o.m.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="febr." a="PT">    <i>febr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fhv." a="PT">     <i>fhv.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="for øvrigt" a="PT"><i>for<b/>øvrigt</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="form." a="PT">    <i>form.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fr." c="frøken, fru, fredag"><i>fr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fx">              <i>fx</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="hg" a="PT">       <i>hg</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ifølge" a="PT">   <i>ifølge</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="jan." a="PT">     <i>jan.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kbm" c="kubikmeter"><i>kbm</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kl." a="PT">      <i>kl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kr" a="PT">       <i>kr</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="l" a="PT">        <i>l</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="m" a="PT">        <i>m</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="m.m." a="PT">     <i>m.m.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="min.">            <i>min.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mm" a="PT">       <i>mm</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="nov." a="PT">     <i>nov.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="o.lign." a="PT">  <i>o.lign.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="on." a="PT">      <i>on.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="p.gr.af" a="PT">  <i>p.gr.af</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pl." a="PT">      <i>pl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="resp.">           <i>resp.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sek." a="PT">     <i>sek.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sing." a="PT">    <i>sing.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="så benævned" a="PT"><i>så<b/>benævned</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ti." a="PT">      <i>ti.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tlf." a="PT">     <i>tlf.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="tusind kroner" a="PT"><i>tusind<b/>kroner</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ved hjælp af" a="PT"><i>ved<b/>hjælp<b/>af</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="venligst" a="PT"><i>venligst</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="adm." a="PT">     <i>adm.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="DM" a="PT" c="domain:sport"><i>DM</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="eft." a="PT">     <i>eft.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ell." a="PT">     <i>ell.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="f.m." a="PT">     <i>f.m.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="FM" a="PT">       <i>FM</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="GB" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>GB</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="h.k." a="PT">     <i>h.k.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="hpl." a="PT">     <i>hpl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="i alm." a="PT">   <i>i<b/>alm.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="IK" a="PT">       <i>IK</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="IQ" a="PT">       <i>IQ</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="jr." a="PT">      <i>jr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kap." a="PT">     <i>kap.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kcal" a="PT">     <i>kcal</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="korr." a="PT">    <i>korr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kV" a="PT">       <i>kV</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="lab." a="PT">     <i>lab.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="LO" a="PT">       <i>LO</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="m.v.h." a="PT">   <i>m.v.h.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mc" a="PT">       <i>mc</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mg" a="PT">       <i>mg</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="modsv." a="PT">   <i>modsv.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="NB" a="PT">       <i>NB</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="Nr." a="PT">      <i>Nr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="o." a="PT">       <i>o.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="omarb." a="PT">   <i>omarb.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="omr." a="PT">     <i>omr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ovenn." a="PT">   <i>ovenn.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ca" a="PT"><i>ca</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pdf" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>pdf</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pkt." a="PT">     <i>pkt.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="DOS" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>DOS</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pr" a="PT">       <i>pr</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ram" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>ram</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="REM" a="PT" c="domain:sjukvård"><i>REM</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="SM" a="PT" c="domain:sex"><i>SM</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sms." a="PT" c="domain:språk"><i>sms.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="stat." a="PT">    <i>stat.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="SU" a="PT">       <i>SU</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sv." a="PT">      <i>sv.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="såk." a="PT">     <i>såk.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tab." a="PT">     <i>tab.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tf" a="PT">       <i>tf</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tre-d" a="PT">    <i>tre-d</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ufo" a="PT">      <i>ufo</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="USD" a="PT">      <i>USD</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="VHF" a="PT">      <i>VHF</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="wap" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>wap</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="årg." a="PT">     <i>årg.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ton" a="PT" c="domain:enheter"><i>ton</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="et gran" a="PT" c="domain:recept"><i>et<b/>gran</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="g." a="PT" c="domain:recept"><i>g.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="spsk." a="PT" c="domain:recept"><i>spsk.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
